Arkansas, session 2025, HB1474.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 12-19-102(a), concerning establishments
that are required to post information about the National Human Trafficking
Hotline, is amended to read as follows:
(a) The following establishments shall post in restrooms and in a
conspicuous place near the entrance of the establishment, or where posters
and notices of this type customarily are posted, a poster described in
subsection (b) of this section measuring at least eight and one-half inches
by eleven inches (8½″ x 11″) in size:
(1) A hotel, motel, or other establishment that has been cited
as a public nuisance for prostitution under § 20-27-401;
(2) A strip club or other sexually oriented business;
(3) A private club that has a liquor permit for on-premises
consumption and does not hold itself out to be a food service establishment;
(4) An airport;
*ANS094*
03-18-2025 14:07:10 ANS094

As Engrossed: H2/18/25 H2/24/25 S3/11/25 S3/18/25 HB1474
(5) A train station that serves passengers;
(6) A bus station;
(7) A privately owned and operated facility that provides food,
fuel, shower or other sanitary facilities, and overnight parking; and
(8) An abortion facility;
(8) A nail salon or massage business licensed by the Department
of Health.

/s/Joey Carr



























03-18-2025 14:07:10 ANS094